New Jersey, session 221, A4229.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   As used 1in1 this act: Agricultural improvement means any improvement, building, structure, or fixture 1that is1 suitable for use in farming 1[which] and1 is located on agricultural land. Agricultural land means land suitable for use in farming. Authority means the New Jersey Economic Development Authority 1,1 established pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1974, c.80 (C.34:1B-4). Beginning farmer means a person with a low or moderate net worth 1[who engages] , as determined by the authority, pursuant to standards established by rule or regulation, who wishes to engage1 in farming 1[or wishes to engage] and has never farmed before, who has engaged1 in farming 1in the State for 10 years or less as of the effective date of this act, or who qualifies as a first-time farmer pursuant to 26 U.S.C. s.147(c)(2)1. 1Beginning farmer loan program or program means the loan program established by the authority pursuant to this act.1 1[Department means the Department of Agriculture.]1 Depreciable agricultural property means personal property 1that is1 suitable for use in farming 1and1 for which an income tax deduction for depreciation is allowable in computing federal income tax under the federal Internal Revenue Code. Farming means the cultivation of land for the production of agricultural crops, the raising of poultry, the production of eggs, the production of milk, the production of fruit or other horticultural crops, grazing, the production of livestock, aquaculture, hydroponics, the production of forest products, or other activities designated by the 1[department] Department of Agriculture1 pursuant to rules and regulations. 1[Low or moderate net worth means a net worth that does not exceed the maximum allowable net worth established by the department pursuant to rules and regulations.  The department shall determine the maximum allowable net worth in using data compiled by the National Agricultural Statistics Service in the United States Department of Agriculture.]1 2. a.  The New Jersey Economic Development Authority, in consultation with the Department of Agriculture, shall develop and administer a beginning farmer loan program to facilitate the acquisition of agricultural land, agricultural improvements, and depreciable agricultural property by beginning farmers. b.   1[(1)]1  A beginning farmer seeking a loan pursuant to 1[this section] the beginning farmer loan program1 shall apply to the authority, in a form and manner 1[as determined by the authority] prescribed thereby1, and 1[shall]1 include 1[such] , in the application, all the1 information 1[as]1 the authority 1[determines is] deems to be1 necessary 1[in consideration of] to effectuate1 the provisions 1and purposes1 of this act. 1[(2)] c.1  In order to receive a loan 1[from the authority pursuant to this act] under the beginning farmer loan program1, the 1[beginning farmer] applicant1 shall 1[meet the following requirements]1: 1[(a)]        (1) establish that1 the 1applicant is a1 beginning farmer 1[shall] , for the purposes of this act and the loan program established pursuant thereto, and is a material and substantial participant in farming activities; (2)1 be a resident of the State; 1[(b)          the] (3) propose to use the loan moneys to engage in the purchase of1 agricultural land, agricultural improvements, or depreciable agricultural property 1[the beginning farmer proposes to purchase shall be]1 located in the State; 1[(c)          the beginning farmer shall] (4)1 have sufficient education, training, or experience 1to engage1 in the type of farming for which the 1[beginning farmer requests the]1 loan 1is sought1; 1[(d)] (5)1 if the loan is for the acquisition of agricultural land, 1[the beginning farmer shall]1 have access to adequate working capital, farm equipment, machinery, or livestock; 1[(e)] (6)1 if the loan is for the acquisition of depreciable agricultural property, 1[the beginning farmer shall]1 have access to adequate working capital or agricultural land; 1[(f)           the beginning farmer shall materially and substantially participate in farming; (g)] (7)  use1 the agricultural land 1[and] ,1 agricultural improvements 1[shall] , and depreciable agricultural property purchased with the loan moneys1 only 1[be used]1 for farming 1activities conducted1 by, or under the direction of, the beginning farmer; and 1[(h)] (8) satisfy1 any other criteria established by the authority 1[pursuant to rules and regulations]1. 1[(3)] d.1  The authority shall review completed applications 1for a beginning farmer loan1 and approve 1those1 applications that meet the requirements of this 1[section] act1 and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant 1[to section 3 of this act] thereto1. 1[c.] e.1  A beginning farmer loan under this section shall be 1[made] issued1 pursuant to a loan agreement 1[with] executed between the beginning farmer and1 the authority 1[,] .  The loan agreement1 shall 1provide for the loan to1 bear interest at rates and terms deemed appropriate by the authority, and shall contain other terms and conditions 1[considered] as may be deemed by the authority to be necessary and1 appropriate 1[by the authority that are consistent with] to effectuate1 the purposes of this act and 1[with]1 the rules and regulations adopted 1[by the authority]1 pursuant 1[to section 3 of this act] thereto1. 1[d.] f.1    The authority 1[may]1, in its discretion, 1may, at any time,1 require a 1recipient of a1 beginning farmer 1[that receives a]1 loan 1[pursuant to this act]1 to submit an audited financial statement to the authority in order to ensure the beginning farmers continued viability. 1[e.] g.1  The authority 1[may]1, either through the adoption of rules and regulations, or through the terms of the loan agreement 1[made] executed1 pursuant to subsection c. of this section, 1may1 establish terms 1and conditions1 governing the incidence of default by a 1recipient of a1 beginning farmer 1[that receives a]1 loan 1[under the program administered pursuant to this act]1. 1[f.] h.1     The authority may participate in, and cooperate with, programs of the Consolidated Farm Service Agency in the United States Department of Agriculture, 1the1 Federal Land Bank, or any other agency or instrumentality of the federal government, or with any program of any other State agency in the administration of the beginning farmer loan program. 3.   The New Jersey Economic Development Authority, in consultation with the Department of Agriculture, shall adopt 1rules and regulations1 , pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), 1[rules and regulations] as1 necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act 1, including, but not limited to, rules and regulations establishing the maximum allowable net worth at which a person will be deemed to be a beginning farmer, for the purposes of this act, using data compiled by the National Agricultural Statistics Service in the United States Department of Agriculture1. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately